Massachusetts, session 194th, S2211.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 45 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out paragraph (m) and inserting in place thereof the following
paragraph:-
(m) The state secretary shall automatically disqualify any person convicted of a felony in
violation of chapter 3, chapter 55, or chapter 268A, or any person convicted of any other state or
federal felony crime of political corruption, including but not limited to violations of sections
1341, 1343, 1346, or 1951 of title 18 of the United States Code, from acting or registering as an
executive or legislative agent for a period of 10 years from the date of conviction.
of 1